Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Settlement and Development Funds

248.650.
Agricultural Diversification and Development Council — Members — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

248.652.
Agricultural diversification and development fund — Source of moneys — Administration. [Repealed.]

248.654.
Tobacco settlement agreement fund — Source of moneys — Distribution of funds.

There is established in the State Treasury a permanent and perpetual fund to be known as the “Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund” to which shall be credited any funds designated to the Commonwealth from the master settlement agreement signed on November 22, 1998, between the participating tobacco manufacturers and the forty (40) settling states or related federal legislation. All investment income earned from moneys deposited in the fund prior to and after April 26, 2000, shall accrue to the fund. Any funds designated to the Commonwealth from the settlement agreement or related federal legislation and all investment income accruing to the fund shall not be expended until appropriated by the General Assembly. The General Assembly’s highest priority for distributing any funds from this account shall be for tobacco farmers and tobacco-impacted communities and health-related areas. Moneys in the fund, including all investment income accruing to the fund, shall be distributed within twenty (20) days of April 26, 2000, and within twenty (20) days of receipt of any moneys deposited to the fund after April 26, 2000, as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) to the rural development fund created in KRS

248.655

;

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the early childhood development fund created in KRS

200.151

; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) to the Kentucky health care improvement fund created in KRS

194A.055

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 586, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 546, § 1, effective April 26, 2000.

Official Comments

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 18, (1) at 1643.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, F, 7, (2), at 1669.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, (5), at 1759.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, A, at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, B, at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, C, at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, D, at 1761.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, E, at 1762.

248.655.
Rural development fund — Purpose — Source of moneys — Strategic plan for fund distribution — Annual report and audit.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Rural Development Fund.” This fund shall exist for the purpose of receipt and expenditure of moneys to improve and promote agricultural development for residents of the Commonwealth. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the chair of the rural development board. Before and after July 1, 2000, fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds in the tobacco settlement agreement fund shall be deposited in this fund as provided under KRS

248.654

. All investment income earned from moneys deposited in the fund shall accrue to the fund. The moneys in the fund shall not lapse at the close of any fiscal year but shall be carried forward in the next fiscal year for the purpose of the fund. The board shall develop and oversee the implementation of a strategic plan. The strategic plan shall identify both short-term and long-term goals and the appropriate oversights to measure progress toward achievement of those goals, and it shall be updated every two (2) years. The board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by September 1 of each year for the preceding fiscal year, outlining its activities and expenditures. The Auditor of Public Accounts, on an annual basis, shall conduct a thorough review of all expenditures from the fund and, if necessary in the opinion of the Auditor, an audit of the operations of the fund. No money in the fund shall be allocated until the board has adopted a strategic plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 546, § 2, effective April 26, 2000.

248.656.
Entities eligible to receive moneys from the agricultural diversification and development fund. [Repealed.]

248.658.
Authorization for council to distribute grant and loan funds from the agricultural diversification and development fund. [Repealed.]

248.660.
Permissible uses for funds distributed to the Kentucky Department of Agriculture. [Repealed.]

248.662.
Permissible uses for funds distributed to the University of Kentucky and Kentucky State University Extension Service programs and the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture. [Repealed.]

248.664.
List of recipients of moneys from tobacco settlement agreement fund for child support administration.

Before distribution of the funds, a list of individuals or entities that are awarded tobacco settlement moneys from the tobacco settlement agreement fund under KRS

248.654

, or related state or federal legislation, shall be forwarded by the cabinet, agency, corporation, authority, or other entity responsible for the distribution of the moneys to all designees of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the administration of the child support program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 567, effective June 20, 2005.